Massachusetts, session 194th, H751.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, subsection (k) 
of section 12B of chapter 76 of the General Laws, shall not apply to public schools in the town of 
Warwick.  
SECTION 2. Nothing in this act shall prevent public schools in the town of Warwick to 
continue to participate in the school choice program under section 12B of chapter 76 of General 
Laws after the effective date of this act. 
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.